Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.90.110

Commission of other crime.

A person who, in the commission of a crime under this chapter, commits any other crime may be punished for that other crime as well as for the crime under this chapter and may be prosecuted for each crime separately.

[ 2016 c 164 s 11.]